Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.62
Emergency management; personnel; advocation of subversive activities against government; prohibited.

No person shall be employed or associated in any capacity in any emergency management organization established under the Emergency Management Act who advocates or has advocated a change by force or violence in the constitutional form of the government of the United States or in this state or the overthrow of any government in the United States by force or violence or who has been convicted of or is under indictment or information charging any subversive act against the United States.

Laws 1951, c. 315, § 13, p. 1082;

Laws 1953, c. 336, § 4, p. 1108;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-829.28;

Laws 1973, LB 494, § 27;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 42.